Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB5104.
PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF MICHIGAN ENACT:
Sec. 102. As used in this act:
(a) "Advisory panel" or "panel" means the marijuana cannabis
regulatory agency.
(b) "Affiliate" means any person that controls, is controlled
by, or is under common control with; is in a partnership or joint
venture relationship with; or is a co-shareholder of a corporation,
BJH H04219'25 (H-1) tv0oug


a co-member of a limited liability company, or a co-partner in a
limited liability partnership with a licensee or applicant.
(c) "Applicant" means a person who applies for a state
operating license. Applicant includes, with respect to disclosures
in an application, for purposes of ineligibility for a license
under section 402, or for purposes of prior marijuana cannabis
regulatory agency approval of a transfer of interest under section
406, and only for applications submitted on or after January 1,
2019, a managerial employee of the applicant, a person holding a
direct or indirect ownership interest of more than 10% in the
applicant, and the following for each type of applicant:
(i) For an individual or sole proprietorship: the proprietor
and the proprietor's spouse.
(ii) For a partnership and limited liability partnership: all
partners and their spouses. For a limited partnership and limited
liability limited partnership: all general and limited partners,
not including a limited partner holding a direct or indirect
ownership interest of 10% or less and who does not exercise control
over or participate in the management of the partnership, and their
spouses. For a limited liability company: all members and managers,
not including a member holding a direct or indirect ownership
interest of 10% or less and who does not exercise control over or
participate in the management of the company, and their spouses.
(iii) For a privately held corporation: all corporate officers
or persons with equivalent titles and their spouses, all directors
and their spouses, and all stockholders, not including those
holding a direct or indirect ownership interest of 10% or less, and
their spouses.
(iv) For a publicly held corporation: all corporate officers or
BJH H04219'25 (H-1) tv0oug


persons with equivalent titles and their spouses, all directors and
their spouses, and all stockholders, not including those holding a
direct or indirect ownership interest of 10% or less, and their
spouses.
(v) For a multilevel ownership enterprise: any entity or
person that receives or has the right to receive more than 10% of
the gross or net profit from the enterprise during any full or
partial calendar or fiscal year.
(vi) For a nonprofit corporation: all individuals and entities
with membership or shareholder rights in accordance with the
articles of incorporation or the bylaws and the spouses of the
individuals.
(d) "Board" means the marijuana cannabis regulatory agency.
(e) "Cannabis regulatory agency" means the marijuana
regulatory agency created under Executive Reorganization Order No.
2019-2, MCL 333.27001, renamed the cannabis regulatory agency under
Executive Reorganization Order No. 2022-1, MCL 333.27002.
(f) (e) "Cutting" means a section of a lead stem or root stock
that is used for vegetative asexual propagation.
(g) (f) "Department" means the department of licensing and
regulatory affairs.
(h) (g) "Grower" means a licensee that is a commercial entity
located in this state that cultivates, dries, trims, or cures and
packages marihuana for sale to a processor, provisioning center, or
another grower.
(i) (h) "Industrial hemp" means that term as defined in
section 3 of the Michigan Regulation and Taxation of Marihuana Act,
2018 IL 1, MCL 333.27953.
(j) (i) "Industrial hemp research and development act" means
BJH H04219'25 (H-1) tv0oug


the industrial hemp research and development act, 2014 PA 547, MCL
286.841 to 286.859.
(k) (j) "Licensee" means a person holding a state operating
license.
(l) (k) "Marihuana" means that term as defined in section 3 of
the Michigan Regulation and Taxation of Marihuana Act, 2018 IL 1,
MCL 333.27953.
(m) (l) "Marihuana facility" means a location at which a
licensee is licensed to operate under this act.
(m) "Marihuana plant" means any plant of the species Cannabis
sativa L. Marihuana plant does not include industrial hemp.
(n) "Marihuana-infused product" means that term as defined in
section 3 of the Michigan Regulation and Taxation of Marihuana Act,
2018 IL 1, MCL 333.27953.
(o) "Marihuana plant" means any plant of the species Cannabis
sativa L. Marihuana plant does not include industrial hemp.
(p) (o) "Marihuana tracking act" means the marihuana tracking
act, 2016 PA 282, MCL 333.27901 to 333.27904.
(p) "Marijuana regulatory agency" means the marijuana
regulatory agency created under Executive Reorganization Order No.
2019-2, MCL 333.27001.
(q) "Michigan medical marihuana act" means the Michigan
Medical Marihuana Act, 2008 IL 1, MCL 333.26421 to 333.26430.
(r) "Municipality" means a city, township, or village.
(s) "Paraphernalia" means any equipment, product, or material
of any kind that is designed for or used in growing, cultivating,
producing, manufacturing, compounding, converting, storing,
processing, preparing, transporting, injecting, smoking, ingesting,
inhaling, or otherwise introducing into the human body, marihuana.
BJH H04219'25 (H-1) tv0oug


(t) "Person" means an individual, corporation, limited
liability company, partnership, limited partnership, limited
liability partnership, limited liability limited partnership,
trust, or other legal entity.
(u) "Plant" means any living organism that produces its own
food through photosynthesis and has observable root formation or is
in growth material.
(v) "Processor" means a licensee that is a commercial entity
located in this state that purchases marihuana from a grower and
that extracts resin from the marihuana or creates a marihuana-
infused product for sale and transfer in packaged form to a
provisioning center or another processor.
(w) "Provisioning center" means a licensee that is a
commercial entity located in this state that purchases marihuana
from a grower or processor and sells, supplies, or provides
marihuana to registered qualifying patients, directly or through
the patients' registered primary caregivers. Provisioning center
includes any commercial property where marihuana is sold at retail
to registered qualifying patients or registered primary caregivers.
A noncommercial location used by a registered primary caregiver to
assist a qualifying patient connected to the caregiver through the
department's cannabis regulatory agency's marihuana registration
process in accordance with the Michigan Medical Marihuana Act is
not a provisioning center for purposes of this act.
(x) "Registered primary caregiver" means a primary caregiver
who has been issued a current registry identification card under
the Michigan Medical Marihuana Act.
(y) "Registered qualifying patient" means a qualifying patient
who has been issued a current registry identification card under
BJH H04219'25 (H-1) tv0oug


the Michigan Medical Marihuana Act or a visiting qualifying patient
as that term is defined in section 3 of the Michigan Medical
Marihuana Act, MCL 333.26423.
(z) "Registry identification card" means that term as defined
in section 3 of the Michigan Medical Marihuana Act, MCL 333.26423.
(aa) "Rules" means rules promulgated under the administrative
procedures act of 1969, 1969 PA 306, MCL 24.201 to 24.328, by the
marijuana cannabis regulatory agency to implement this act.
(bb) "Safety compliance facility" means a licensee that is a
commercial entity that takes marihuana from a marihuana facility or
receives marihuana from a registered primary caregiver, tests the
marihuana for contaminants and for tetrahydrocannabinol and other
cannabinoids, returns the test results, and may return the
marihuana to the marihuana facility.
(cc) "Secure transporter" means a licensee that is a
commercial entity located in this state that stores marihuana and
transports marihuana between marihuana facilities for a fee.
(dd) "Seed" means the fertilized, ungerminated, matured ovule,
containing an embryo or rudimentary plant, of a marihuana plant
that is flowering.
(ee) "Seedling" means a marihuana plant that has germinated
and has not flowered and is not harvestable.
(ff) "State operating license" or, unless the context requires
a different meaning, "license" means a license that is issued under
this act that allows the licensee to operate as 1 of the following,
specified in the license:
(i) A grower.
(ii) A processor.
(iii) A secure transporter.
BJH H04219'25 (H-1) tv0oug


(iv) A provisioning center.
(v) A safety compliance facility.
(gg) "Statewide monitoring system" or, unless the context
requires a different meaning, "system" means an internet-based,
statewide database established, implemented, and maintained by the
department cannabis regulatory agency under the marihuana tracking
act, that is available to licensees, law enforcement agencies, and
authorized state departments and agencies on a 24-hour basis for
all of the following:
(i) Verifying registry identification cards.
(ii) Tracking marihuana transfer and transportation by
licensees, including transferee, date, quantity, and price.
(iii) Verifying in commercially reasonable time that a transfer
will not exceed the limit that the patient or caregiver is
authorized to receive under section 4 of the Michigan Medical
Marihuana Act, MCL 333.26424.
(hh) "Tissue culture" means a marihuana plant cell, cutting,
tissue, or organ, that is kept under a sterile condition on a
nutrient culture medium of known composition and that does not have
visible root formation. A tissue culture is not a marihuana plant
for purposes of a grower.
(ii) "Usable marihuana" means the dried leaves, flowers, plant
resin, or extract of the marihuana plant, but does not include the
seeds, stalks, and roots of the plant.
Sec. 402. (1) The marijuana cannabis regulatory agency shall
issue a license to an applicant if all of the following conditions
are met:
(a) The applicant submits a complete application.
(b) The applicant pays both the nonrefundable application fee
BJH H04219'25 (H-1) tv0oug


required under section 401(5) and the regulatory assessment
established by the marijuana cannabis regulatory agency for the
first year of operation.
(c) The marijuana cannabis regulatory agency determines that
the applicant is qualified to receive a license under this act.
(2) An applicant is ineligible to receive a license if any of
the following circumstances exist:
(a) The applicant has been convicted of or released from
incarceration for a felony under the laws of this state, any other
state, or the United States within the past 10 years or has been
convicted of a controlled substance-related felony within the past
10 years. This subdivision does not apply to a felony for the
manufacture, processing, or distribution of marihuana, or
possession with the intent to manufacture, process, or distribute
marihuana, unless the felony involved the distribution of marihuana
to a minor.
(b) Within the past 5 years the applicant has been convicted
of a misdemeanor involving a controlled substance, theft,
dishonesty, or fraud in any state or been found responsible for
violating a local ordinance in any state involving a controlled
substance, dishonesty, theft, or fraud that substantially
corresponds to a misdemeanor in that state. This subdivision does
not apply to a misdemeanor or ordinance violation for the
possession or use of marihuana.
(c) The applicant has knowingly submitted an application for a
license under this act that contains false information.
(d) The applicant is an employee of the marijuana cannabis
regulatory agency.
(e) The applicant fails to demonstrate the applicant's ability
BJH H04219'25 (H-1) tv0oug


to maintain adequate premises liability and casualty insurance for
its proposed marihuana facility.
(f) The applicant holds an elective office of a governmental
unit of this state, another state, or the federal government. This
subdivision does not apply to an elected officer of or employee of
a federally recognized Indian tribe or to an elected precinct
delegate.
(g) The applicant is a member of or employed by a regulatory
body of a governmental unit in this state, another state, or the
federal government, or is employed by a governmental unit of this
state. This subdivision does not apply to any of the following:
(i) An elected officer of or employee of a federally recognized
Indian tribe.
(ii) An elected precinct delegate.
(iii) The spouse of a person who applies for a state operating
license unless the spouse's position creates a conflict of interest
or is within any of the following:
(A) The marijuana cannabis regulatory agency.
(B) A regulatory body of a governmental unit in this state,
another state, or the federal government that makes decisions
regarding medical marihuana.
(h) The marijuana cannabis regulatory agency determines that
the applicant is not in compliance with section 205(1).
(i) The marijuana cannabis regulatory agency determines that
the applicant is not in compliance with section 408.
(j) The applicant fails to meet other criteria established by
rule.
(3) In determining whether to grant a license to an applicant,
the marijuana cannabis regulatory agency may also consider all of
BJH H04219'25 (H-1) tv0oug


the following:
(a) The business probity; financial ability and experience;
and responsibility or means to operate or maintain a marihuana
facility of the applicant and of any other person that meets either
of the following:
(i) Controls, directly or indirectly, the applicant.
(ii) Is controlled, directly or indirectly, by the applicant or
by a person who controls, directly or indirectly, the applicant.
(b) The financial ability of the applicant to purchase and
maintain adequate liability and casualty insurance.
(c) The sources and total amount of the applicant's
capitalization to operate and maintain the proposed marihuana
facility.
(d) Whether the applicant has been indicted for, charged with,
arrested for, or convicted of, pled guilty or nolo contendere to,
forfeited bail concerning, or had expunged any relevant criminal
offense under the laws of any jurisdiction, either felony or
misdemeanor, not including traffic violations, regardless of
whether the offense has been expunged, pardoned, or reversed on
appeal or otherwise. This subdivision does not apply to a criminal
offense for the possession, use, manufacture, processing, or
distribution of marihuana, or possession with the intent to
manufacture, process, or distribute marihuana, unless the felony
involved the distribution of marihuana to a minor.
(e) Whether the applicant has filed, or had filed against it,
a proceeding for bankruptcy within the past 7 years.
(f) Whether the applicant has been served with a complaint or
other notice filed with any public body regarding payment of any
tax required under federal, state, or local law that has been
BJH H04219'25 (H-1) tv0oug


delinquent for 1 or more years.
(g) Whether the applicant has a history of noncompliance with
any regulatory requirements in this state or any other
jurisdiction.
(h) Whether at the time of application the applicant is a
defendant in litigation involving its business practices.
(i) Whether the applicant meets other standards in rules
applicable to the license category.
(4) Each applicant shall ensure that 1 set of fingerprints is
submitted to the department of state police. The applicant shall
submit with its application the applicant's written consent to the
criminal history check described in this section and the submission
of the applicant's fingerprints to, and the inclusion of the
applicant's fingerprints in, the state and federal database systems
described in subsection (7).
(5) The fingerprints required under subsection (4) may be
taken by a law enforcement agency or any other person determined by
the department of state police to be qualified to take
fingerprints. The applicant shall submit a fingerprint processing
fee to the department in an amount required under section 3 of 1935
PA 120, MCL 28.273, and any costs imposed by the Federal Bureau of
Investigation.
(6) The department of state police shall do all of the
following:
(a) Conduct a criminal history check on each applicant and
request the Federal Bureau of Investigation to make a determination
of the existence of any national criminal history pertaining to
each applicant.
(b) Provide the marijuana cannabis regulatory agency with a
BJH H04219'25 (H-1) tv0oug


written report containing the criminal history record information
of each applicant.
(7) All of the following apply concerning fingerprints
submitted to the department of state police under this section:
(a) The department of state police shall store and retain all
fingerprints submitted under this section in an automated
fingerprint identification system database that searches against
latent fingerprints, and provides for an automatic notification
when a subsequent fingerprint is submitted into the system that
matches a fingerprint previously submitted under this section or
when the criminal history of an individual whose fingerprints are
retained in the system is updated. Upon receiving a notification,
the department of state police shall immediately notify the
marijuana cannabis regulatory agency. Information in the database
maintained under this subsection is confidential, is not subject to
disclosure under the freedom of information act, 1976 PA 442, MCL
15.231 to 15.246, and shall must not be disclosed to any person
except for purposes of this act or for law enforcement purposes.
(b) The department of state police shall forward all
fingerprints submitted to it under this section to the Federal
Bureau of Investigation for submission of those fingerprints into
the FBI automatic notification system. This subdivision does not
apply until the department of state police is a participant in the
FBI automatic notification system. As used in this subdivision:
(i) "Automatic notification system" means a system that stores
and retains fingerprints, and that provides for an automatic
notification to a participant if and when a fingerprint is
submitted into the system that matches an individual whose
fingerprints are retained in the system or if and when the criminal
BJH H04219'25 (H-1) tv0oug


history of an individual whose fingerprints are retained in the
system is updated.
(ii) "FBI automatic notification system" means the automatic
notification system that is maintained by the Federal Bureau of
Investigation.
(8) The marijuana cannabis regulatory agency shall review all
applications for licenses and shall inform each applicant of the
marijuana cannabis regulatory agency's decision.
(9) A license shall be issued for a 1-year period and is
renewable annually. Except as otherwise provided in this act, the
marijuana cannabis regulatory agency shall renew a license if all
of the following requirements are met:
(a) The licensee applies to the marijuana cannabis regulatory
agency on a renewal form provided by the marijuana cannabis
regulatory agency that requires information prescribed in rules.
(b) The application is received by the marijuana cannabis
regulatory agency on or before the expiration date of the current
license.
(c) The licensee pays the regulatory assessment under section
603.
(d) The licensee meets the requirements of this act and any
other renewal requirements set forth in rules.
(10) The department cannabis regulatory agency shall notify
the licensee by mail or electronic mail email at the last known
address on file with the marijuana cannabis regulatory agency
advising of the time and procedure for paying and the amount of the
regulatory assessment under section 603. The failure of the
licensee to receive notice under this subsection does not relieve
the licensee of the responsibility for renewing the license.
BJH H04219'25 (H-1) tv0oug


(11) If a license renewal application is not submitted by the
license expiration date, the license may be renewed within not
later than 60 days after its expiration date upon application,
payment of the regulatory assessment under section 603, and
satisfaction of any renewal requirement and late fee set forth in
rules. The licensee may continue to operate during the 60 days
after the license expiration date if the license is renewed by the
end of the 60-day period.
(12) License The expiration of a person's state operating
license, or the mere fact that a person is no longer a licensee or
no longer operates a marihuana facility, does not terminate the
marijuana cannabis regulatory agency's authority to impose
sanctions on a licensee whose license has expired.the person.
(13) In its decision on an application for renewal, the
marijuana cannabis regulatory agency shall consider any specific
written input it receives from an individual or entity within the
local unit of government in which the applicant for renewal is
located.
(14) A licensee must consent in writing to inspections,
examinations, searches, and seizures that are permitted under this
act and must provide a handwriting exemplar, fingerprints,
photographs, and information as authorized in this act or by rules.
(15) An applicant or licensee has a continuing duty to provide
information requested by the marijuana cannabis regulatory agency
and to cooperate in any investigation, inquiry, or hearing
conducted by the marijuana cannabis regulatory agency.
Sec. 407. (1) If an applicant or licensee fails to comply with
this act or rules, if a licensee fails to comply with the marihuana
tracking act, if a licensee no longer meets the eligibility
BJH H04219'25 (H-1) tv0oug


requirements for a license under this act, or if an applicant or
licensee fails to provide information the board cannabis regulatory
agency requests to assist in any investigation, inquiry, or board
hearing, the board cannabis regulatory agency may deny, suspend,
revoke, or restrict a license. The board cannabis regulatory agency
may suspend, revoke, or restrict a license and require the removal
of a licensee or an employee of a licensee for a violation of this
act, rules, the marihuana tracking act, or any ordinance adopted
under section 205. The board cannabis regulatory agency may impose
civil fines of up to $5,000.00 against an individual and up to
$10,000.00 or an amount equal to the daily gross receipts,
whichever is greater, against a licensee for each violation of this
act, rules, or an order of the board. cannabis regulatory agency.
Assessment of a civil fine under this subsection is not a bar to
the investigation, arrest, charging, or prosecution of an
individual for any other violation of this act and is not grounds
to suppress evidence in any criminal prosecution that arises under
this act or any other law of this state.
(2) The board cannabis regulatory agency shall comply with the
administrative procedures act of 1969, 1969 PA 306, MCL 24.201 to
24.328, when denying, revoking, suspending, or restricting a
license or imposing a fine. The board may suspend a license without
notice or hearing upon a determination that the safety or health of
patrons or employees is jeopardized by continuing a marihuana
facility's operation. If the board suspends a license under this
subsection without notice or hearing, a prompt postsuspension
hearing must be held to determine if the suspension should remain
in effect. The suspension may remain in effect until the board
determines that the cause for suspension has been abated. The board
BJH H04219'25 (H-1) tv0oug


may revoke the license or approve a transfer or sale of the license
upon a determination that the licensee has not made satisfactory
progress toward abating the hazard.The cannabis regulatory agency
may summarily suspend a license in accordance with section 92 of
the administrative procedures act of 1969, 1969 PA 306, MCL 24.292,
if the cannabis regulatory agency determines that the licensee has
engaged in conduct that requires emergency action because the
conduct poses a risk to the public health, safety, or welfare. For
purposes of this subsection, conduct that poses a risk to the
public health, safety, or welfare includes, but is not limited to,
any of the following:
(a) The licensee is in possession of marihuana for which the
source cannot be determined.
(b) The cannabis regulatory agency determines that the
licensee is in possession of marihuana that the licensee obtained
in violation of this act.
(c) The licensee obstructs a cannabis regulatory agency
investigation.
(d) The licensee fails to provide the cannabis regulatory
agency with records that the licensee is required to provide to the
cannabis regulatory agency under this act or rules.
(3) After denying an application for a license, the board
cannabis regulatory agency shall, upon request, provide a public
investigative hearing at which the applicant is given the
opportunity to present testimony and evidence to establish its
suitability for a license. Other testimony and evidence may be
presented at the hearing, but the board's cannabis regulatory
agency's decision must be based on the whole record before the
board cannabis regulatory agency and is not limited to testimony
BJH H04219'25 (H-1) tv0oug


and evidence submitted at the public investigative hearing.
(4) Except for license applicants who that may be granted a
hearing at the discretion of the board cannabis regulatory agency
under subsection (3), any party aggrieved by an action of the board
cannabis regulatory agency suspending, revoking, restricting, or
refusing to renew a license, or imposing a fine, shall must be
given a hearing before the board cannabis regulatory agency upon
request. A request for a hearing must be made to the board cannabis
regulatory agency in writing within not later than 21 days after
service of notice of the action of the board. cannabis regulatory
agency. Notice of the action of the board cannabis regulatory
agency must be served either by personal delivery or by certified
mail, postage prepaid, to the aggrieved party. Notice served by
certified mail is considered complete on the business day following
the date of the mailing.
(5) The board cannabis regulatory agency may conduct
investigative and contested case hearings; issue subpoenas for the
attendance of witnesses; issue subpoenas duces tecum for the
production of books, ledgers, records, memoranda, electronically
retrievable data, and other pertinent documents; and administer
oaths and affirmations to witnesses as appropriate to exercise and
discharge the powers and duties of the board cannabis regulatory
agency under this act. The executive director of the department
cannabis regulatory agency or his or her the director's designee
may issue subpoenas and administer oaths and affirmations to
witnesses.
Final Page
BJH H04219'25 (H-1) tv0oug